Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 5 Museums
13-5-903. Advisory board.

(a)

There is created the Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise Advisory Board which shall advise the Director of the Arkansas Heritage Division, the Director of the Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise, and staff of the Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise on the development of permanent and temporary exhibits, a plan for acquisition of resource materials, and development of educational and other programming.

(b)(1)

The board shall consist of nine (9) members appointed as follows:

(A)

Three (3) members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

(B)

Three (3) members shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

(C)

Three (3) members shall be appointed by the Governor.

(2)(A)

The terms of office of the initial members of the board shall be determined by lot so that two (2) members serve an initial one-year term, two (2) members serve an initial two-year term, two (2) members serve an initial three-year term, and two (2) members serve an initial four-year term.

(B)

Successor members shall serve four-year terms.

(3)

No member shall serve more than two (2) four-year terms.

(c)

The board shall meet at least quarterly. Special meetings may be called by the chair or a majority of the board.

(d)

The chair will be elected by members for a one-year term.

(e)

Any vacancy in the membership of the board shall be filled by the appointing authority.

(f)

The members of the board shall receive no compensation for their services, but they may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with §25-16-902.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1176, § 3; 2017, No. 720, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 5594.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment deleted “with at least one (1) from each congressional district” following “members” in the introductory language of (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment inserted “Director of the Arkansas Heritage Division” in (a).

13-5-904. Powers of center.

(a)

The Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise shall have the power to enter into, with the consent of the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism:

(1)

Contracts for the purchase, construction, lease, or other acquisition of real property to house the center and to acquire or construct necessary support facilities;

(2)

Contracts to purchase or lease personal property for use as exhibits or for use as research material; and

(3)

Professional service contracts with appropriate professionals to assist in the establishment of the center and the development and operation of the center's programs and activities.

(b)

The center shall have the authority to accept gifts of real or personal property and money.

(c)(1)

The center shall have the authority to set fees related to the programs and services offered by the center, including, but not limited to, admission fees.

(2)(A)

Income generated by fees shall be cash funds of the center to be used solely for the support of the center.

(B)

Fee income shall be deposited in a bank account but shall be subject to appropriation by the General Assembly.

(d)

The center may request the assistance of other appropriate state agencies in establishing and operating the center and its programs.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1176, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 5595.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added “with the consent of the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” in the introductory language of (a).

Subchapter 10

— Museum Property Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-5-1001. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Museum Property Act”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

13-5-1002. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to:

(1)

Establish procedures for vesting in a museum ownership of abandoned or undocumented property in the possession of the museum;

(2)

Establish procedures to terminate loans of property to a museum;

(3)

Allow a museum to conserve or dispose of loaned or undocumented property under certain conditions; and

(4)

Limit actions to recover loaned or undocumented property.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

13-5-1003. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Address” means the most recent location of a claimant or lender as indicated by a museum's records pertaining to the property;

(2)(A)

“Claimant” means a person who has established or claims entitlement to or an interest in property held by a museum.

(B)

“Claimant” does not mean a lender;

(3)

“Lender” means the person identified by the records of a museum as the owner or rightful possessor of a loan held by a museum;

(4)(A)

“Loan” means property that a lender has placed in the custody of a museum.

(B)

“Loan” does not include a consignment of property for sale or property donated to a museum;

(5)(A)

“Museum” means an institution or entity located in Arkansas that:

(i)

Is operated by a nonprofit corporation, trust, association, public agency, or educational institution;

(ii)

Is operated primarily for educational, scientific, historic preservation, cultural, or aesthetic purposes; and

(iii)

Owns, borrows, cares for, exhibits, studies, archives, or catalogues property.

(B)

“Museum” includes historical societies, historic sites, landmarks, parks, archives, monuments, botanical gardens, arboreta, zoos, nature centers, planetaria, aquaria, libraries, technology centers, and art, history, science, and natural history museums;

(6)

“Permanent loan” means a loan to a museum for an indefinite term;

(7)

“Person” means an individual, association, partnership, corporation, trust, estate, or other entity;

(8)

“Property” means a document or tangible object, animate or inanimate, with intrinsic historic, scientific, artistic, or cultural value that is in the custody of a museum;

(9)

“Unclaimed property” means property meeting the following conditions:

(A)

The property was placed with the museum for exhibition or other purposes; and

(B)

The original person placing the property with the museum, or a person acting legitimately on the original person's behalf, has not contacted the museum in writing regarding the property for at least:

(i)

Ten (10) years from the date of the beginning of the period for which the property was placed with the museum if the property was placed with the museum for an indefinite or undetermined period; or

(ii)

Five (5) years after the date upon which the definite period in which the property was placed with the museum expired; and

(10)(A)

“Undocumented property” means property:

(i)

That is held by a museum; and

(ii)

The ownership of which cannot be determined from the museum's records.

(B)

Undocumented property shall not be construed to include loaned property.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

13-5-1004. Procedure for obtaining ownership of an abandoned loan.

(a)

By complying with subsection (b) or subsection (c) of this section, a museum may obtain ownership of a loan if:

(1)

The loan agreement has expired; or

(2)

Both:

(A)

The loan has been in the museum's custody for more than ten (10) years; and

(B)

The loan agreement does not provide for a longer term for the loan or another disposition.

(b)(1)

If the address of the lender is known, the museum shall send the notice required in subsection (d) of this section to the lender by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested.

(2)(A)

If the return receipt showing receipt of the notice is returned and the lender fails to object within ninety (90) days of the date of the return receipt, the loan shall be considered abandoned and its ownership shall vest in the museum.

(B)

If the museum did not receive a return receipt showing receipt of the notice, the museum may proceed in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.

(c)(1)

If the museum is unable to determine the identity of the lender or the lender's address, the museum shall publish the notice required under subsection (d) of this section at least one (1) time a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper with general circulation in:

(A)

The county:

(i)

Of last known address of the lender; and

(ii)

In which the museum is located; or

(B)

The State of Arkansas.

(2)

If the lender fails to object within ninety (90) days from the last date of the publication, the loan shall be considered abandoned and its ownership shall vest in the museum.

(d)

The notice shall contain:

(1)

The name, address, and telephone number of the museum;

(2)

A complete description of the loan;

(3)

The lender's identity if that information is available from the museum's records;

(4)

The lender's last known address if that information is available from the museum's records; and

(5)

A statement that the loan shall be considered abandoned and shall become the property of the museum if the lender or claimant does not make a timely objection in accordance with subsection (b) or subsection (c) of this section, whichever is applicable.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1; 2017, No. 259, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “Both:”
in (a)(2).

13-5-1005. Museum's right to claim ownership of undocumented property.

(a)

Undocumented property in the possession of a museum shall become the museum's property if no person has claimed the undocumented property within seven (7) years after the museum documented possession of the undocumented property.

(b)

This section does not vest ownership of the undocumented property in the museum if the undocumented property is determined later to be:

(1)

Stolen property; or

(2)

Property whose ownership is subject to federal law.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

13-5-1006. Duties of museum concerning a loan.

(a)

At the time of a loan to a museum, the museum shall:

(1)

Make and retain a written record of the following:

(A)

The lender's name, address, and telephone number;

(B)

A description of the loan;

(C)

The date of the loan; and

(D)

The expiration date of the loan; and

(2)

Provide the lender with a signed receipt or copy of the loan agreement containing the information set out in subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

(b)

The museum's general duties with respect to a loan include:

(1)

Updating museum records whenever:

(A)

A lender informs the museum of a change of address or change in the ownership of the loan; and

(B)

The lender and museum negotiate a change in the terms of the loan;

(2)

Providing the lender with notice about any update concerning the lender's loan; and

(3)

Providing copies of §§13-5-1004,13-5-1007, and13-5-1009:

(A)

To each lender who made a loan to the museum before the effective date of this subchapter and that loan is in the custody of the museum;

(B)

To the lender at the time of the loan; and

(C)

Upon a lender's request.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

13-5-1007. Duties of lender concerning the lender's loan.

(a)

A lender who has made a loan to a museum shall promptly notify the museum in writing about a change in:

(1)

The lender's address; and

(2)(A)

A change in the ownership of the loan.

(B)(i)

It shall be the responsibility of the owner of a loan to provide sufficient proof of his or her ownership to the museum.

(ii)

If there is a dispute about ownership, the museum shall not be liable for its good faith refusal to surrender a loan unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b)

If the museum notifies the lender by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, that the loan is terminated, the lender shall:

(1)

Acknowledge in writing the termination and inform the museum whether the lender wants the return of the loan; and

(2)(A)

Retrieve the loan no later than six (6) months from the date of the museum's notice terminating the loan if the lender wants the loan returned.

(B)

If the lender fails to retrieve the loan within the time set out in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, the loan shall be considered abandoned and ownership shall vest in the museum.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

13-5-1008. Lien for expenses for care of unclaimed property.

A museum has a lien on unclaimed property for any expenses incurred while caring for the unclaimed property.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

13-5-1009. Conservation measures.

(a)

If immediate conservation is necessary to protect a loan, a museum's property, or the safety and welfare of the public and the museum's staff and the loan agreement between the museum and the lender does not provide otherwise, a museum has the right to apply conservation measures to a loan without the lender's permission.

(b)

If immediate conservation is not necessary but conservation is needed to preserve the loan's value, a museum has the right to apply a conservation measure to a loan:

(1)

After the museum has notified the lender by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, that a conservation measure is needed; and

(2)

If the lender or claimant:

(A)

Does not respond to the notice within seven (7) days after the date on the return receipt showing receipt of the notice; or

(B)

Refuses to consent to the protective measures and will not agree to the termination of the loan and the immediate retrieval of the loan.

(c)

When a conservation measure is undertaken under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section, the museum:

(1)

Has a lien on the loan and on the proceeds of any disposition of the loan for the cost of the conservation measure; or

(2)

Is not liable for any injury to or loss of the loan if the museum:

(A)

Had a reasonable belief at the time conservation measures were taken that the conservation measures were necessary; and

(B)

Exercised reasonable care in the choice and application of conservation measures.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

13-5-1010. Transfer of title to museum.

A museum which acquires ownership of property under this subchapter receives the property free of any claim by a claimant or lender.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

13-5-1011. Records retention schedule.

A museum shall keep all records relating to loans and undocumented property while the museum has possession of the property or for twenty-five (25) years, whichever period of time is longer.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

13-5-1012. Conflicts with § 18-28-201 et seq.

This subchapter controls in the event that it conflicts with any of the provisions of §18-28-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1.

Cross References.

Unclaimed Property Act, §
18-28-201 et seq.

13-5-1013. Rules.

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this subchapter, including, but not limited to, rules concerning the form and substance of loan agreements.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2242, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5596.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism, in consultation with the Department of Arkansas Heritage”.